Hawaii statutes.
§42F-101 Definitions. As used
in this [chapter], unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

"Grant" means an award of state funds
by the legislature, by an appropriation to a specified recipient, to support
the activities of the recipient and permit the community to benefit from those
activities.

"Recipient" means any organization or
person receiving a grant. [L 1997, c 190, pt of §3; am L 2014, c 96, §5]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next